src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.aff
FLAG num
SFX 1217 Y 1
SFX 1217 ki niyjszego .
PFX 1217 Y 1
PFX 1217 0 noj .
SFX 1218 Y 1
SFX 1218 ki niyjsze .
PFX 1218 Y 1
PFX 1218 0 noj .
SFX 1219 Y 1
SFX 1219 ki niyjszo .
PFX 1219 Y 1
PFX 1219 0 noj .
SFX 1220 Y 1
SFX 1220 ki niyjszōm .
PFX 1220 Y 1
PFX 1220 0 noj .
SFX 1221 Y 1
SFX 1221 ki niyjszych .
PFX 1221 Y 1
PFX 1221 0 noj .
SFX 1222 Y 1
SFX 1222 ki niyjszyj .
PFX 1222 Y 1
PFX 1222 0 noj .
SFX 1223 Y 1
SFX 1223 ki niyjszymi .
PFX 1223 Y 1
PFX 1223 0 noj .
SFX 1224 Y 1
SFX 1224 ki niyjszymu .
PFX 1224 Y 1
PFX 1224 0 noj .
SFX 1225 Y 1
SFX 1225 ki niyjszym .
PFX 1225 Y 1
PFX 1225 0 noj .
SFX 1226 Y 1
SFX 1226 ki niyjszy .
PFX 1226 Y 1
PFX 1226 0 noj .
SFX 1227 N 1
SFX 1227 ić ylibymy .
SFX 1228 N 1
SFX 1228 ić ylibyście .
SFX 1229 N 1
SFX 1229 ić yliby .
SFX 1230 N 1
SFX 1230 ić ylichmy .
SFX 1231 N 1
SFX 1231 ić ylimy .
SFX 1232 N 1
SFX 1232 ić yliście .
SFX 1233 N 1
SFX 1233 ić yli .
SFX 1234 N 1
SFX 1234 ić yłabych .
SFX 1235 N 1
SFX 1235 ić yłabyś .
SFX 1236 N 1
SFX 1236 ić yłaby .
SFX 1237 N 1
SFX 1237 ić yłach .
SFX 1238 N 1
SFX 1238 ić yłaś .
SFX 1239 N 1
SFX 1239 ić yła .
SFX 1240 N 1
SFX 1240 ić yłoby .
SFX 1241 N 1
SFX 1241 ić yło .
SFX 1242 N 1
SFX 1242 ić yłybymy .
SFX 1243 N 1
SFX 1243 ić yłybyście .
SFX 1244 N 1
SFX 1244 ić yłyby .
SFX 1245 N 1
SFX 1245 ić yłychmy .
SFX 1246 N 1
SFX 1246 ić yłymy .
SFX 1247 N 1
SFX 1247 ić yłyście .
SFX 1248 N 1
SFX 1248 ić yły .
SFX 1249 N 1
SFX 1249 cić ćcie .
SFX 1250 N 1
SFX 1250 cić ćmy .
SFX 1251 N 1
SFX 1251 cić ć .
SFX 1252 N 1
SFX 1252 gi dzy .
SFX 1253 N 1
SFX 1253 e ij .
SFX 1254 Y 1
SFX 1254 e ij .
PFX 1254 Y 1
PFX 1254 0 noj .
SFX 1255 N 1
SFX 1255 ało ele .
SFX 1256 N 1
SFX 1256 sny śniyjsi .
SFX 1257 N 1
SFX 1257 sny śniyjszego .
SFX 1258 N 1
SFX 1258 sny śniyjsze .
SFX 1259 N 1
SFX 1259 sny śniyjszo .
SFX 1260 N 1
SFX 1260 sny śniyjszōm .
SFX 1261 N 1
SFX 1261 sny śniyjszych .
SFX 1262 N 1
SFX 1262 sny śniyjszyj .
SFX 1263 N 1
SFX 1263 sny śniyjszymi .
SFX 1264 N 1
SFX 1264 sny śniyjszymu .
SFX 1265 N 1
SFX 1265 sny śniyjszym .
SFX 1266 N 1
SFX 1266 sny śniyjszy .
SFX 1267 Y 1
SFX 1267 sny śniyjsi .
PFX 1267 Y 1
PFX 1267 0 noj .
SFX 1268 Y 1
SFX 1268 sny śniyjszego .
PFX 1268 Y 1
PFX 1268 0 noj .
SFX 1269 Y 1
SFX 1269 sny śniyjsze .
PFX 1269 Y 1
PFX 1269 0 noj .
SFX 1270 Y 1
SFX 1270 sny śniyjszo .
PFX 1270 Y 1
PFX 1270 0 noj .
SFX 1271 Y 1
SFX 1271 sny śniyjszōm .
PFX 1271 Y 1
PFX 1271 0 noj .
SFX 1272 Y 1
SFX 1272 sny śniyjszych .
PFX 1272 Y 1
PFX 1272 0 noj .
SFX 1273 Y 1
SFX 1273 sny śniyjszyj .
PFX 1273 Y 1
PFX 1273 0 noj .
SFX 1274 Y 1
SFX 1274 sny śniyjszymi .
PFX 1274 Y 1
PFX 1274 0 noj .
SFX 1275 Y 1
SFX 1275 sny śniyjszymu .
PFX 1275 Y 1
PFX 1275 0 noj .
SFX 1276 Y 1
SFX 1276 sny śniyjszym .
PFX 1276 Y 1
PFX 1276 0 noj .
SFX 1277 Y 1
SFX 1277 sny śniyjszy .
PFX 1277 Y 1
PFX 1277 0 noj .
SFX 1278 N 1
SFX 1278 asto eście .
SFX 1279 N 1
SFX 1279 cho szyj .
SFX 1280 Y 1
SFX 1280 cho szyj .
PFX 1280 Y 1
PFX 1280 0 noj .
SFX 1281 N 1
SFX 1281 chy si .
SFX 1282 N 1
SFX 1282 a yńcia .
SFX 1283 N 1
SFX 1283 sny śni .
SFX 1284 N 1
SFX 1284 ło lij .
SFX 1285 Y 1
SFX 1285 ło lij .
PFX 1285 Y 1
PFX 1285 0 noj .
SFX 1286 N 1
SFX 1286 ły lyjsi .
SFX 1287 N 1
SFX 1287 ły lyjszego .
SFX 1288 N 1
SFX 1288 ły lyjsze .
SFX 1289 N 1
SFX 1289 ły lyjszo .
SFX 1290 N 1
SFX 1290 ły lyjszōm .
SFX 1291 N 1
SFX 1291 ły lyjszych .
SFX 1292 N 1
SFX 1292 ły lyjszyj .
SFX 1293 N 1
SFX 1293 ły lyjszymi .
SFX 1294 N 1
SFX 1294 ły lyjszymu .
SFX 1295 N 1
SFX 1295 ły lyjszym .
SFX 1296 N 1
SFX 1296 ły lyjszy .
SFX 1297 Y 1
SFX 1297 ły lyjsi .
PFX 1297 Y 1
PFX 1297 0 noj .
SFX 1298 Y 1
SFX 1298 ły lyjszego .
PFX 1298 Y 1
PFX 1298 0 noj .
SFX 1299 Y 1
SFX 1299 ły lyjsze .
PFX 1299 Y 1
PFX 1299 0 noj .
SFX 1300 Y 1
SFX 1300 ły lyjszo .
PFX 1300 Y 1
PFX 1300 0 noj .
SFX 1301 Y 1
SFX 1301 ły lyjszōm .
PFX 1301 Y 1
PFX 1301 0 noj .
SFX 1302 Y 1
SFX 1302 ły lyjszych .
PFX 1302 Y 1
PFX 1302 0 noj .
SFX 1303 Y 1
SFX 1303 ły lyjszyj .
PFX 1303 Y 1
PFX 1303 0 noj .
SFX 1304 Y 1
SFX 1304 ły lyjszymi .
PFX 1304 Y 1
PFX 1304 0 noj .
SFX 1305 Y 1
SFX 1305 ły lyjszymu .
PFX 1305 Y 1
PFX 1305 0 noj .
SFX 1306 Y 1
SFX 1306 ły lyjszym .
PFX 1306 Y 1
PFX 1306 0 noj .
SFX 1307 Y 1
SFX 1307 ły lyjszy .
PFX 1307 Y 1
PFX 1307 0 noj .
SFX 1308 N 1
SFX 1308 nōńć cie .
SFX 1309 N 1
SFX 1309 nōńć łech .
SFX 1310 N 1
SFX 1310 nōńć łeś .
SFX 1311 N 1
SFX 1311 nōńć my .
SFX 1312 N 1
SFX 1312 nōńć 0 .
SFX 1313 N 1
SFX 1313 ōńć bych .
SFX 1314 N 1
SFX 1314 ōńć byś .
SFX 1315 N 1
SFX 1315 ōńć by .
SFX 1316 N 1
SFX 1316 ōńć cie .
SFX 1317 N 1
SFX 1317 ōńć libymy .
SFX 1318 N 1
SFX 1318 ōńć libyście .
SFX 1319 N 1
SFX 1319 ōńć liby .
SFX 1320 N 1
SFX 1320 ōńć lichmy .
SFX 1321 N 1
SFX 1321 ōńć limy .
SFX 1322 N 1
SFX 1322 ōńć liście .
SFX 1323 N 1
SFX 1323 ōńć li .
SFX 1324 N 1
SFX 1324 ōńć łabych .
SFX 1325 N 1
SFX 1325 ōńć łabyś .
SFX 1326 N 1
SFX 1326 ōńć łaby .
SFX 1327 N 1
SFX 1327 ōńć łach .
SFX 1328 N 1
SFX 1328 ōńć łaś .
SFX 1329 N 1
SFX 1329 ōńć ła .
SFX 1330 N 1
SFX 1330 ōńć łech .
SFX 1331 N 1
SFX 1331 ōńć łeś .
SFX 1332 N 1
SFX 1332 ōńć łoby .
SFX 1333 N 1
SFX 1333 ōńć ło .
SFX 1334 N 1
SFX 1334 ōńć łybymy .
SFX 1335 N 1
SFX 1335 ōńć łybyście .
SFX 1336 N 1
SFX 1336 ōńć łyby .
SFX 1337 N 1
SFX 1337 ōńć łychmy .
SFX 1338 N 1
SFX 1338 ōńć łymy .
SFX 1339 N 1
SFX 1339 ōńć łyście .
SFX 1340 N 1
SFX 1340 ōńć ły .
SFX 1341 N 1
SFX 1341 ōńć my .
SFX 1342 N 1
SFX 1342 ōńć na .
SFX 1343 N 1
SFX 1343 ōńć niecie .
SFX 1344 N 1
SFX 1344 ōńć niesz .
SFX 1345 N 1
SFX 1345 ōńć nie .
SFX 1346 N 1
SFX 1346 ōńć niynci .
SFX 1347 N 1
SFX 1347 ōńć niyntego .
SFX 1348 N 1
SFX 1348 ōńć niynte .
SFX 1349 N 1
SFX 1349 ōńć niynto .
SFX 1350 N 1
SFX 1350 ōńć niyntōm .
SFX 1351 N 1
SFX 1351 ōńć niyntych .
SFX 1352 N 1
SFX 1352 ōńć niyntyj .
SFX 1353 N 1
SFX 1353 ōńć niyntymi .
SFX 1354 N 1
SFX 1354 ōńć niyntymu .
SFX 1355 N 1
SFX 1355 ōńć niyntym .
SFX 1356 N 1
SFX 1356 ōńć niynty .
SFX 1357 N 1
SFX 1357 ōńć niyńciach .
SFX 1358 N 1
SFX 1358 ōńć niyńciami .
SFX 1359 N 1
SFX 1359 ōńć niyńcia .
SFX 1360 N 1
SFX 1360 ōńć niyńcie .
SFX 1361 N 1
SFX 1361 ōńć niyńcio .
SFX 1362 N 1
SFX 1362 ōńć niyńciōm .
SFX 1363 N 1
SFX 1363 ōńć niyńciu .
SFX 1364 N 1
SFX 1364 ōńć niyńciym .
SFX 1365 N 1
SFX 1365 ōńć niyńć .
SFX 1366 N 1
SFX 1366 ōńć nōm .
SFX 1367 N 1
SFX 1367 ōńć nōńć .
SFX 1368 N 1
SFX 1368 ōńć nymy .
SFX 1369 N 1
SFX 1369 ōńć 0 .
SFX 1370 N 1
SFX 1370 ś sbych .
SFX 1371 N 1
SFX 1371 ś sbyś .
SFX 1372 N 1
SFX 1372 ś sby .
SFX 1373 N 1
SFX 1373 ś slibymy .
SFX 1374 N 1
SFX 1374 ś slibyście .
SFX 1375 N 1
SFX 1375 ś sliby .
SFX 1376 N 1
SFX 1376 ś slichmy .
SFX 1377 N 1
SFX 1377 ś slimy .
SFX 1378 N 1
SFX 1378 ś sliście .
SFX 1379 N 1
SFX 1379 ś sli .
SFX 1380 N 1
SFX 1380 ś słabych .
SFX 1381 N 1
SFX 1381 ś słabyś .
SFX 1382 N 1
SFX 1382 ś słaby .
SFX 1383 N 1
SFX 1383 ś słach .
SFX 1384 N 1
SFX 1384 ś słaś .
SFX 1385 N 1
SFX 1385 ś sła .
SFX 1386 N 1
SFX 1386 ś słech .
SFX 1387 N 1
SFX 1387 ś słeś .
SFX 1388 N 1
SFX 1388 ś słoby .
SFX 1389 N 1
SFX 1389 ś sło .
SFX 1390 N 1
SFX 1390 ś słybymy .
SFX 1391 N 1
SFX 1391 ś słybyście .
SFX 1392 N 1
SFX 1392 ś słyby .
SFX 1393 N 1
SFX 1393 ś słychmy .
SFX 1394 N 1
SFX 1394 ś słymy .
SFX 1395 N 1
SFX 1395 ś słyście .
SFX 1396 N 1
SFX 1396 ś sły .
SFX 1397 N 1
SFX 1397 ś sna .
SFX 1398 N 1
SFX 1398 ś snōm .
SFX 1399 N 1
SFX 1399 ś snōncego .
SFX 1400 N 1
SFX 1400 ś snōnce .
SFX 1401 N 1
SFX 1401 ś snōnco .
SFX 1402 N 1
SFX 1402 ś snōncōm .
SFX 1403 N 1
SFX 1403 ś snōnc .
SFX 1404 N 1
SFX 1404 ś snōncych .
SFX 1405 N 1
SFX 1405 ś snōncyj .
SFX 1406 N 1
SFX 1406 ś snōncymi .
SFX 1407 N 1
SFX 1407 ś snōncymu .
SFX 1408 N 1
SFX 1408 ś snōncym .
SFX 1409 N 1
SFX 1409 ś snōncy .
SFX 1410 N 1
SFX 1410 ś snymy .
SFX 1411 N 1
SFX 1411 ś s .
SFX 1412 N 1
SFX 1412 0 cie .
SFX 1413 N 1
SFX 1413 0 niecie .
SFX 1414 N 1
SFX 1414 0 niesz .
SFX 1415 N 1
SFX 1415 0 nie .
SFX 1416 N 1
SFX 1416 0 nijcie .
SFX 1417 N 1
SFX 1417 0 nijmy .
SFX 1418 N 1
SFX 1418 0 nij .
SFX 1419 N 1
SFX 1419 0 ninci .
SFX 1420 N 1
SFX 1420 0 nintego .
