src/fastspell_dictionaries/szl.dic
chutki/81,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,1205,1206,1207,1208,1209,1210,1211,1212,1213,1214,1215,1216,1217,1218,1219,1220,1221,1222,1223,1224,1225,1226
ciasto/92,93,99,96,100,361,101,1278
ciało/92,93,99,96,100,361,101,1255
cicho/1279,1280
ciepło/1284,1285
czule/1253,1254
drugi/1252,82,83,84,85,87,88,443,89,90
jasny/115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,1283,1256,1257,1258,1259,1260,1261,1262,1263,1264,1265,1266,1267,1268,1269,1270,1271,1272,1273,1274,1275,1276,1277
krasny/115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,1283,1256,1257,1258,1259,1260,1261,1262,1263,1264,1265,1266,1267,1268,1269,1270,1271,1272,1273,1274,1275,1276,1277
kruchy/115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,1281
kurza/1040,1041,1042,1043,1044,1282,1046,1047
masny/115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,1283
miasto/92,93,99,96,100,361,101,1278
mōndrze/1253,1254
niysrogi/1252,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90
niywłosny/115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,1283
nogle/1253,1254
powiylić/744,835,279,287,288,836,928,929,930,931,932,933,934,745,757,758,759,760,761,762,763,764,765,766,837,1227,1228,1229,1230,1231,1232,1233,1234,1235,1236,1237,1238,1239,1240,1241,1242,1243,1244,1245,1246,1247,1248,767,768,769,770,771,772,773,774,775,776,777
poświyncić/744,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297,298,299,300,301,302,303,304,305,306,307,308,309,310,745,757,758,759,760,761,762,763,764,765,766,767,768,769,770,771,772,773,774,775,776,777,1249,1250,1251
prosia/1040,1041,1042,1043,1044,1282,1046,1047
rychło/1285,1284
spłacić/744,279,280,281,282,283,284,285,286,287,288,289,290,291,292,293,294,295,296,297,298,299,300,301,302,303,304,305,306,307,308,309,310,745,757,758,759,760,761,762,763,764,765,766,767,768,769,770,771,772,773,774,775,776,777,1249,1250,1251
suchy/115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88,1281
szczyrze/1254,1253
tyngi/2850,2851,2852,2853,2854,2855,2856,2857,2858,2859,2860,1252,82,83,84,85,86,87,88,89,90,2839,2840,2841,2842,2843,2844,2845,2846,2847,2848,2849
uciś/1383,1384,1385,1386,1387,1389,1393,1395,1396,1397,1398,1410,1412,1818,1819,1009,1013,1413,1414,1415,1431,1440,1441,1442,1443,1444,1445,1446,1447,1448,1449,1450,1451,1452,1453,1454,1455,1456,1457,1458,1820
upolić/744,835,279,287,288,836,928,929,930,931,932,933,934,745,757,758,759,760,761,762,763,764,765,766,837,1227,1228,1229,1230,1231,1232,1233,1234,1235,1236,1237,1238,1239,1240,1241,1242,1243,1244,1245,1246,1247,1248,767,768,769,770,771,772,773,774,775,776,777
wyciepnōńć/1308,154,155,156,157,158,159,160,161,162,163,164,165,166,1309,1310,167,168,169,170,171,172,173,174,175,1311,176,177,178,179,180,181,182,183,184,185,186,187,188,189,190,191,192,193,194,195,196,197,198,199,200,201,202,203,204,205,206,207,208,209,210,211,1312
wyciepōńć/1313,1314,1315,1316,1317,1318,1319,1320,1321,1322,1323,1324,1325,1326,1327,1328,1329,1330,1331,1332,1333,1334,1335,1336,1337,1338,1339,1340,1341,1342,1343,1344,1345,1346,1347,1348,1349,1350,1351,1352,1353,1354,1355,1356,1357,1358,1359,1360,1361,1362,1363,1364,1365,1366,1367,1368,1369
zaciepōńć/1313,1314,1315,1316,1317,1318,1319,1320,1321,1322,1323,1324,1325,1326,1327,1328,1329,1330,1331,1332,1333,1334,1335,1336,1337,1338,1339,1340,1341,1342,1343,1344,1345,1346,1347,1348,1349,1350,1351,1352,1353,1354,1355,1356,1357,1358,1359,1360,1361,1362,1363,1364,1365,1366,1367,1368,1369
zwiyź/2682,2683,2684,2685,2686,2687,2688,2689,2690,2691,2692,2693,2694,2695,2696,2697,2698,2699,2700,2701,2702,2703,2704,2705,2706,2707,2708,2709,2710,2711,2712,2713,2714,2715,2716,2717,2718,2719,2720,2721,1412,1013
ôsztrzaś/1376,1378,1379,1383,1384,1385,1386,1387,1389,1393,1395,1396,1397,1398,1410,1411,1413,1414,1415,1416,1417,1418,1431,1440,1441,1442,1443,1444,1445,1446,1447,1448,1449,1450,1451,1452,1453,1454,1455,1456,1457,1458
ściykły/1297,1298,1299,1300,1301,1302,1303,1304,1305,1306,1307,618,1286,1287,1288,1289,1290,1291,1292,1293,1294,1295,1296,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
światły/1297,1298,1299,1300,1301,1302,1303,1304,1305,1306,1307,618,1286,1287,1288,1289,1290,1291,1292,1293,1294,1295,1296,115,116,118,119,83,85,86,87,88
